src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51neljäsentiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:neljittäsentiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:neljiltäsentiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:neljilläsentiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:neljillesentiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:neljinesentiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:neljistäsentiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:neljinäsentiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:neljiensentiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:neljiinsentiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:neljissäsentiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:neljinsentiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:tsentiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:neljiäsentiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:neljiksisentiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ttäsentiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ltäsentiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:lläsentiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:llesentiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:stäsentiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:näsentiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:nsentiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:änsentiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ssäsentiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:sentiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äsentiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:ksisentiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51neljäseptiljardia

+Pl+Abe:neljittäseptiljardeitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:neljiltäseptiljardeilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:neljilläseptiljardeilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:neljilleseptiljardeille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:neljineseptiljardeine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:neljistäseptiljardeista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:neljinäseptiljardeina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:neljienseptiljardien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:neljiinseptiljardeihin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:neljissäseptiljardeissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:neljinseptiljardein  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:tseptiljardit  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:neljiäseptiljardeja  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:neljiksiseptiljardeiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ttäseptiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ltäseptiljardilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:lläseptiljardilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:lleseptiljardille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:stäseptiljardista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:näseptiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:nseptiljardin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:änseptiljardiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ssäseptiljardissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:septiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äseptiljardia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:ksiseptiljardiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51neljäseptiljoonaa

+Pl+Abe:neljittäseptiljoonitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Abl:neljiltäseptiljoonilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ade:neljilläseptiljoonilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+All:neljilleseptiljoonille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Com:neljineseptiljoonine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ela:neljistäseptiljoonista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ess:neljinäseptiljoonina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Gen:neljienseptiljoonien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ill:neljiinseptiljooniin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ine:neljissäseptiljoonissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Ins:neljinseptiljoonin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Nom:tseptiljoonat  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Par:neljiäseptiljoonia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Pl+Tra:neljiksiseptiljooniksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abe:ttäseptiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Abl:ltäseptiljoonalta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ade:lläseptiljoonalla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+All:lleseptiljoonalle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ela:stäseptiljoonasta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ess:näseptiljoonana  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Gen:nseptiljoonan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ill:änseptiljoonaan  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Ine:ssäseptiljoonassa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Nom:septiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Par:äseptiljoonaa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Sg+Tra:ksiseptiljoonaksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51neljäskahdeksatta

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsilläkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnelläkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnenkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttäkahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikahdeksatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51neljäskiljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittäkiljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltäkiljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsilläkiljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsillekiljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinekiljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistäkiljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinäkiljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsienkiljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiinkiljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissäkiljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsinkiljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnetkiljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiäkiljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksikiljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettäkiljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltäkiljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnelläkiljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnellekiljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestäkiljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenäkiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nkiljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteenkiljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessäkiljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:skiljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttäkiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksikiljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
neljäsentiljoonaa+Num:neljä  NUM_51neljäsentiljoonaa  ;
neljäseptiljardia+Num:neljä  NUM_51neljäseptiljardia  ;
neljäseptiljoonaa+Num:neljä  NUM_51neljäseptiljoonaa  ;
neljäskahdeksatta+Num:neljä  NUM_51neljäskahdeksatta  ;
neljäskiljardis+Num:neljä  NUM_51neljäskiljardis  ;
